Maine, session 132, LD311.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2512, sub-§1, ¶F, as enacted by PL 1999, c. 777, §1, is
amended to read:
F. Establish standards relating to sanitation for all establishments required to have
inspection under paragraph A or persons required to be licensed under section 2514;
and
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §2512, sub-§1, ¶G, as enacted by PL 1999, c. 777, §1, is
amended to read:
G. Require that persons licensed under this chapter keep records; fully and correctly
disclose all transactions involved in their business; and afford to the commissioner and
the commissioner's representatives, including representatives of other governmental
agencies designated by the commissioner, access to their places of business and
opportunity, at all reasonable times, to examine the facilities, inventory and records, to
copy the records and to take reasonable samples of the inventory upon the payment of
the fair market value.; and
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §2512, sub-§1, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. Designate state inspectors essential to the operations of official establishments and
require inspection to continue at an official establishment on state holidays or beyond
the regular work shift or workweek for state inspectors as long as the necessary
inspectors are available and the official establishment pays all overtime salaries for
inspections necessary to keep the plant open and other expenses caused by the overtime
employment.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §2512, sub-§2, ¶E, as amended by PL 2021, c. 64, §14, is
repealed.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR0742(01)